Illinois, session 104th, SB76.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Local Governmental and Governmental 5Employees Tort Immunity Act is amended by adding Sections 62-107.5 and 2-210.5 as follows: 7    (745 ILCS 10/2-107.5 new)8    Sec. 2-107.5. Public entity liability for unauthorized 9access to records, data, or electronic information systems. A 10local public entity is not liable for injury caused by any 11unauthorized access to government records, data, or electronic 12information systems by any person or entity. 13    (745 ILCS 10/2-210.5 new)14    Sec. 2-210.5. Public employee liability for unauthorized 15access to records, data, or electronic information systems. A 16public employee acting in the scope of his or her employment is 17not liable for an injury caused by any unauthorized access to 18government records, data, or electronic information systems by 19any person or entity.